Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1733.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Legislative intent.The practice of social work, marriage and family therapy [and], professional counseling and professional art therapy within this Commonwealth is hereby declared to affect the public 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 safety and welfare and to be subject to regulation and control in the public interest to protect the public from unprofessional, improper, unauthorized and unqualified practice of licensed social work, licensed marriage and family therapy [and], licensed professional counseling and licensed professional art therapy. This act regulates only those who hold themselves out as licensed social workers, licensed clinical social workers, licensed marriage and family therapists [or as], licensed professional counselors or as licensed professional art therapists. Acquisition of a license under this act shall not be made a condition of the employment of a person by the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions or by nonprofit agencies.Section 2. The definitions of "board" and "diagnosis" in section 3 of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accredited educational institution." A university or college approved by the American Art Therapy Association or accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs.* * *"Art therapy." The use of a specialized form of psychotherapy:(1) Conducted by a professionally trained art therapist who has met the standards outlined in section 7(h) or (i) and is currently practicing under a qualified art therapy 20250HB1733PN2133 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supervisor.(2) That is an evidence-based clinical practice, including the integration of psychological theories, art therapy theory, art-based assessment models, traditional verbal counseling techniques and the creative process to address and alleviate mental and emotional disorders and psychopathologies, improve cognitive and sensory-motor functions and support wellness through diagnosis, assessment, testing, treatment, evaluation and rehabilitation in a professional relationship."Art therapy services." The use of expressive arts media, creative techniques, nonverbal communication, psychotherapy, art-based assessment models and the creative process in a therapeutic relationship between a client and licensed professional art therapist and includes the following services:(1) Evaluation, assessment and diagnosis to define and implement individualized treatment plans to address developmental, rehabilitative, habilitative, medical, mental health, preventive, wellness care or educational needs of the client.(2) Therapeutic interventions to facilitate alternative modes of receptive and expressive communication that can circumvent the limitations of verbal articulation.(3) Use of treatment interventions that include psychotherapy or counseling integrated with art therapy theory, the creative process or art media to facilitate human development and to identify and remediate mental, emotional or behavioral disorders and associated distresses that interfere with daily functioning.(4) Utilizing appropriate knowledge and specialized 20250HB1733PN2133 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 training in art therapy theory, art media, the creative process, the neurobiological implications of art-making, psychotherapy and counseling principles and theory and clinical decision-making skills to inform practice and determine the appropriate course of action within the therapist's scope of art therapy practice, tailored to the context of each specific clinical setting."Board." The State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists [and], Professional Counselors and Professional Art Therapists under the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs within the Department of State."Certified art therapist." An individual holding national board certification from the Art Therapy Credentials Board.* * *"Diagnosis." The term includes the following:(1) A clinical social work assessment, a marriage and family therapist assessment [or], a professional counselor assessment or a professional art therapy assessment.(2) The utilization of currently accepted diagnostic classifications by a clinical social worker, a marriage and family therapist [or], a professional counselor or a professional art therapist, including, but not limited to, the American Psychiatric Association's Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, as amended and supplemented, but only to the extent of the clinical social worker's, marriage and family therapist's [or], professional counselor's or professional art therapist's education, training, experience and scope of practice as established by this act."Face-to-face meeting." A meeting that is live, interactive 20250HB1733PN2133 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and visual. The term includes a video meeting if the meeting is synchronous and involves verbal and visual interaction."Independent practice of professional art therapy." The application of professional art therapy knowledge and skills by an individual:(1) who styles oneself as a professional art therapist;(2) who is not under supervision and regulates and is responsible for the individual's own practice and treatment procedures; and(3) whose practice is not affiliated with any other practice, health care facility, government agency or government-regulated social service agency."Licensed associate art therapist." An individual who has met the application requirement outlined in section 7(i) and has been issued a license to practice art therapy under an approved qualified art therapy supervisor in accordance with rules of the board. An individual holding a licensed associate art therapist license is not authorized to practice autonomously and are solely permitted to deliver art therapy services so long as the individual continues to meet the supervision requirements outlined in section 7(i)(4), (5) and (6).* * *"Licensed professional art therapist." An individual who has met the application requirements outlined in section 7(h) and has been issued a license for the independent practice of clinical art therapy in accordance with rules of the board. An individual who engages in the practice of professional art therapy and who holds a current license under this act.* * *"Practice of professional art therapy." The integrative 20250HB1733PN2133 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application of psychotherapeutic principles and methods with specialized training in strategic use of art media, the neurobiological implications of art making and art-based assessment models while under the supervision of a licensed professional art therapist supervisor acceptable to the board in accordance with the board's regulations. The term includes the following:(1) The evaluation, assessment, diagnosis and treatment of normal and abnormal cognitive, developmental, behavioral and emotional disorders in individuals, families and groups.(2) Strategic application of therapeutic art interventions in the context of applied psychological theory in a psychotherapeutic relationship.(3) Facilitation of visual, nonverbal and verbal receptive and expressive communication and implementation of treatment plans to help clients improve cognitive and sensory motor functions, increase self-awareness and self-esteem, cope with traumatic experience and grief, reduce symptoms of depression, anger and distress and improve educational performance, vocational performance and social functioning.* * *"Practice of professional art therapy." The integrative application of psychotherapeutic principles and methods with specialized training in strategic use of art media, the neurobiological implications of art making and art-based assessment models and includes the following:(1) The evaluation, assessment, diagnosis and treatment of normal and abnormal cognitive, developmental, behavioral and emotional disorders in individuals, families and groups.(2) Strategic application of therapeutic art 20250HB1733PN2133 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interventions in the context of applied psychological theory in a psychotherapeutic relationship.(3) Facilitation of visual, nonverbal and verbal receptive and expressive communication and implementation of treatment plans to help clients improve cognitive and sensory motor functions, increase self-awareness and self-esteem, cope with traumatic experience and grief, reduce symptoms of depression, anger and distress and improve educational performance, vocational performance and social functioning.* * *"Professional art therapy assessment." The professional application of psychotherapeutic and art therapy theories and techniques to evaluate, identify and establish plans for treatment of individuals, families and groups with emotional, mental, addiction and behavioral disorders. The term includes a mental health examination and psychological history.* * *"Qualified art therapy supervisor." An individual who:(1) is licensed by the Commonwealth as a licensed professional art therapist; or(2) is a licensed professional counselor, licensed clinical mental health counselor, licensed clinical social worker, licensed clinical psychologist, licensed marriage and family therapist or licensed psychiatrist and holds an active certification as a registered art therapist with board certification or art therapy credentialed supervisor.* * *"Supervised experience." The regular oversight of the functions and activities of a graduate art therapy student either as part of an internship or practicum experience or the 20250HB1733PN2133 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practice of art therapy to fulfill the requirements to be licensed under this act by a qualified art therapy supervisor."Supervision." A formalized professional relationship between a qualified art therapy supervisor and supervisee in which the qualified art therapy supervisor directs, guides, monitors, instructs and evaluates the supervisee's professional art therapy practice while promoting the development of the supervisee's knowledge, skills and abilities to provide professional art therapy services in an ethical and competent manner and includes the following:(1) An acceptance of direct responsibility for the client services rendered by the supervisee via face-to-face meetings with the supervisee.(2) The qualified art therapy experience is under the order, control and full professional responsibility of a qualified art therapy supervisor who reviews aspects of art therapy practice and case management in a face-to-face meeting with the supervisee.(3) The qualified art therapy supervisor ensures that the extent, kind and quality of art therapy performed is consistent with the education, training and experience of the supervisee.(4) Reviewing client or patient records, monitoring and evaluating assessment, diagnosis and treatment decisions of the art therapist supervisee.(5) Ensuring compliance with laws and regulations governing the practice of professional art therapy and licensed associate art therapy.Section 3. Sections 4, 5 heading, (a), (k) and (l) and 6(2) and (3) of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), are 20250HB1733PN2133 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amended to read:Section 4. License required.It shall be unlawful for any person to hold oneself forth as a licensed bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, licensed clinical social worker, licensed associate marriage and family therapist, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed associate professional counselor [or], licensed professional counselor or licensed professional art therapist unless he or she shall first have obtained a license pursuant to this act.Section 5. State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists [and], Professional Counselors and Professional Art Therapists.(a) Creation.--There is hereby created the State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists [and], Professional Counselors and Professional A rt Therapists , a departmental administrative board in the Department of State. The board shall consist of [13] 15 members who are citizens of the United States and who have been residents of this Commonwealth for a two-year period, two of whom shall be public members; five of whom shall be licensed social workers, at least one of whom shall be a licensed clinical social worker and at least one of whom shall be a licensed social worker; two of whom shall be licensed marriage and family therapists; two of whom shall be licensed professional counselors; one of whom shall be either a licensed marriage and family therapist or a licensed professional counselor whose membership shall rotate between those professions at the expiration of the member's second term; two of whom shall be licensed professional art therapists; and one of whom shall be the Commissioner of Professional and 20250HB1733PN2133 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Occupational Affairs.* * *(k) Notice.--Reasonable notice of all meetings shall be given in conformity with [the act of July 3, 1986 (P.L.388, No.84), known as the Sunshine Act] 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(l) Operating procedures.--The board shall meet within 30 days after the appointment of its new members and set up operating procedures and develop application forms for licensing clinical social workers, associate marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapists, associate professional counselors and professional counselors and professional art therapists. It shall be the responsibility of the board to circulate these forms and educate the public to the requirements of licensing in order to hold oneself out as a licensed bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, licensed associate marriage and family therapist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed associate professional counselor or licensed professional counselor within the Commonwealth.Section 6. Powers and functions of board.The board shall have the following powers:* * *(2) To adopt and, from time to time, revise such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this act. Such regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, standards of professional practice and conduct for licensed bachelor social workers, licensed social workers, licensed clinical social workers, licensed associate marriage and family therapists, licensed marriage 20250HB1733PN2133 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and family therapists, licensed associate professional counselors [and] licensed professional counselors, professional art therapists and licensed associate art therapists in Pennsylvania.(3) To examine for, deny, approve, issue, revoke, suspend or renew licenses of bachelor social workers, social workers, clinical social workers, associate marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapists, associate professional counselors [and professional counselors], professional art therapists and licensed associate art therapists, professional art therapists and licensed associate art therapists pursuant to this act and to conduct hearings in connection therewith.* * *Section 4. Section 7 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 7. Qualifications for license.* * *(h) Professional art therapist license.--An applicant shall be qualified to hold oneself out as a licensed professional art therapist if the applicant submits proof satisfactory to the board that all of the following apply:(1) The applicant is at least 21 years of age.(2) The applicant is of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions).(3) The applicant has successfully met one of the following educational requirements:20250HB1733PN2133 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Holds a master's degree with a minimum of 60 semester hours or 90 quarter hours of graduate coursework in art therapy from a program that is approved by the American Art Therapy Association or accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs at the time the degree was conferred.(ii) Has successfully completed a master's degree with a minimum of 60 semester hours or 90 quarter hours of graduate coursework in art therapy or a field determined by the board by regulation to be closely related to the practice of professional art therapy and has successfully completed a minimum of 30 graduate credit hours in the following subject areas: theory and practice of art therapy, art therapy media and techniques, history of art therapy, human growth and developmental dynamics in art, application of art therapy with people in different treatment settings, art therapy appraisal, diagnosis and assessment, group art therapy, ethical and legal issues of art therapy practice, matters of cultural and social diversity bearing on the practice of art therapy and standards of good art therapy practice and completed at least 700 hours of supervised internship experience.(iii) Holds a doctoral degree in art therapy from an accredited educational institution or holds a doctoral degree in a field determined by the board by regulation to be closely related to the practice of professional art therapy from an accredited educational institution.(4) The applicant has complied with the experience requirements as follows:20250HB1733PN2133 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) An individual meeting the educational requirements of paragraph (3)(i) or (ii) must have completed at least 3,000 hours of supervised clinical experience, acceptable to the board as determined by regulation, which was obtained subsequent to granting of the master's degree in a period of not less than two years. Of these 3,000 total hours, at least 50% must be in direct contact with clients with demonstrated experience in diagnosing or treating mental, emotional, behavioral and addiction disorders.(ii) An individual meeting the educational requirements of paragraph (3)(iii) must have completed at least 2,400 hours of supervised clinical experience, acceptable to the board as determined by regulation, 1,200 hours of which was obtained subsequent to the granting of the doctoral degree.(5) The applicant's postgraduate experience is completed under supervision by a licensed professional art therapist, a certified art therapist or any other licensed mental health professional acceptable to the board as determined by regulation.(6) The application has been accompanied by the application fee.(7) The applicant demonstrates professional competency by satisfactorily completing the Art Therapy Credentials Board Examination, or a substantially equivalent exam approved by the board.(8) The applicant has not been convicted of a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction 20250HB1733PN2133 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which if committed in this Commonwealth would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, unless the applicant otherwise satisfies the qualifications contained in or authorized by this act and:(i) at least 10 years have elapsed from the date of conviction; or(ii) the applicant satisfactorily demonstrates to the board that the applicant has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction such that licensure of the applicant should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of clients or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violation,in which case the board may issue a probationary license for the remainder of the 10 years required in subparagraph (i).As used in this paragraph, the term "convicted" includes a judgment, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere.(h.1) Authorization for licensed professional art therapists.--A licensed professional art therapist may engage in the independent practice of art therapy and is authorized to diagnose and treat mental disorders specified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of mental disorders of the American Psychiatric Association designated by the board by rules and regulations.(i) Licensed associate art therapist.--The board shall issue an associate art therapist license to an applicant if the applicant has completed and submitted an application form in the manner as prescribed, accompanied by applicable fees, and provides evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant 20250HB1733PN2133 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 has fulfilled the following requirements:(1) Is at least 21 years of age.(2) Is of good moral character. In determining moral character under this paragraph, the board may take into consideration whether the applicant has engaged in conduct or activities which would constitute grounds for discipline under this act. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessments in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113.(3) Has completed the educational and practicum or internship requirements for licensure as an associate art therapist in this Commonwealth as outlined in section 7(h)(2), (3) and (4).(4) Has submitted one letter of recommendation from a qualified supervisor who has provided direct clinical supervision of the applicant's graduate program clinical training, practicum or internship attesting to the applicant's integrity, competence and moral character and completed a postgraduate supervised training plan on forms prescribed by the board describing services to be provided, place of employment, individuals responsible for clinical supervision and a statement acknowledging the license regulations and requirements. Supervision of art therapy students shall be provided by a qualified art therapy supervisor. No licensed associate art therapist shall practice art therapy without supervision by a licensed professional art therapist or a supervisor otherwise acceptable to the board. The plan for supervision of the licensed associate art therapist shall be approved in writing 20250HB1733PN2133 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the committee prior to any actual performance of art therapy by the licensed associate art therapist.(j) Licenses for associate art therapists.--(1) A license issued under this section is valid for a period of five years so long as the individual holding the license provides evidence annually, through a form prescribed by the board, that the individual is receiving not less than one hour of direct face-to-face contact with a qualified art therapy supervisor per 10 hours of face-to-face practice with clients, including no less than two hours of supervision per month, through group or individual supervision.(2) At the end of the five-year period, a licensed associate art therapist who has not met the requirements for licensure as a professional art therapist may submit an application for extension of licensure as an associate art therapist to the board. The application must include:(i) a plan for completing the requirements to obtain licensure as a licensed professional art therapist;(ii) documentation of compliance with the continuing education requirements;(iii) documentation of compliance with requirements related to supervision; and(iv) letters of recommendation from at least one qualified art therapy supervisor providing supervision to the applicant.(3) An extension of a license as an associate art therapist under this subsection is valid for a period of two years and is not renewable.Section 5. Section 8(b) of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), is amended to read:20250HB1733PN2133 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 8. Procedures for licensing.* * *(b) Issuance of license.--The board shall issue to each person who meets the licensure requirements of this act a certificate setting forth that such person is licensed to hold oneself out as a licensed bachelor social worker, a licensed social worker, a licensed clinical social worker, a licensed associate marriage and family therapist, a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed associate professional counselor [or], a licensed professional counselor or a licensed professional art therapist.Section 6. Section 9 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 9. Exemption from licensure examination.* * *(d) Professional art therapists.--The requirements of section 7(h)(5) shall not apply and a license shall be issued without examination to an applicant who meets all of the following requirements:(1) Has submitted an application for a professional art therapist license, accompanied by the required fee, within two years after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Can demonstrate proof of practice of professional art therapy for at least five years prior to the date of application for license.(3) Has successfully met one of the following educational requirements:(i) Has a master ' s degree of at least 48 semester hours or 72 quarter hours from a program in art therapy approved by the American Art Therapy Association.20250HB1733PN2133 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Has a master ' s degree from an accredited educational institution with a course of study that the Art Therapy Credentials Board has determined is equivalent to an approved program in art therapy for purposes of meeting the education requirements for registration as an art therapist.(iii) Has a doctoral degree in art therapy or a field determined by the board by regulation to be closely related to the practice of professional art therapy from an accredited educational institution.(4) Holds a current credential as a registered art therapist and has passed the national board certification examination of the Art Therapy Credentials Board.Section 7. Section 10 of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), is amended to read:Section 10. Reciprocity.(a) General rule.--The board shall have the power to grant a reciprocal license to an applicant who is licensed or certified as a bachelor social worker, social worker, clinical social worker, associate marriage and family therapist, marriage and family therapist, associate professional counselor [or], professional counselor or professional art therapist in another state and has demonstrated qualifications which equal or exceed those required pursuant to this act in the determination of the board, provided that no license shall be granted under this section to an applicant unless the state in which the applicant is licensed affords reciprocal treatment to persons who are residents of this Commonwealth and who are licensed pursuant to this act.(b) Emergencies.--The board shall have the power to allow an 20250HB1733PN2133 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual who is licensed or certified as a clinical social worker, a marriage and family therapist [or], a professional counselor or a professional art therapist in another state to practice in this Commonwealth without licensure for no more than 60 days as part of a relief effort related to a state of emergency as declared by the Federal Government or the Governor.Section 8. Section 10.1 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 10.1. Endorsement of out-of-State licenses.* * *(d) Professional art therapist license.--The board may issue a professional art therapist license without examination to an applicant holding a professional art therapist or equivalent mental health license in another state who submits proof satisfactory to the board of all of the following:(1) The applicant is of good moral character.(2) The applicant meets the educational requirements as specified in section 7(h)(3).(3) The applicant has completed a minimum of 3,000 hours of supervised clinical experience acceptable to the board.(4) The applicant holds a license that is in good standing from another state.(5) The applicant has, at a minimum, been actively engaged in the practice of professional art therapy work for five of the last seven years immediately preceding the filing of the application for licensure by endorsement with the board.(6) The applicant has submitted an application accompanied by the application fee.(7) The applicant has not been convicted of a felony 20250HB1733PN2133 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which if committed in this Commonwealth would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, unless the applicant otherwise satisfies the qualifications contained in or authorized by this act and:(i) at least 10 years have elapsed from the date of conviction; or(ii) the applicant satisfactorily demonstrates to the board that the applicant has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction such that licensure of the applicant should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of clients or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violation,in which case the board may issue a probationary license for the remainder of the 10 years required in subparagraph (i).As used in this paragraph, the term "convicted" includes a judgment, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere.Section 9. Section 12 of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), is amended to read:Section 12. Reinstatement of license.Unless ordered to do so by Commonwealth Court or an appeal therefrom, the board shall not reinstate the license of a person to practice as a bachelor social worker, social worker, clinical social worker, associate marriage and family therapist, marriage and family therapist, associate professional counselor [or], professional counselor or professional art therapist pursuant to this act, which has been revoked. Any person whose license has 20250HB1733PN2133 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been revoked may apply for reinstatement, after a period of at least five years, but must meet all of the licensing qualifications of this act, including the examination requirement, if he or she desires to practice as a bachelor social worker, social worker, clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist [or], professional counselor or professional art therapist pursuant to this act at any time after such revocation.Section 10. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 16.7. Restriction on use of title " licensed professional art therapist, " "licensed associate art therapist" and related titles. (a) General rule.--Only individuals who have received licenses as licensed professional art therapists under this act may engage in the independent practice of professional art therapy, use the letters " L.P.A.T. " in connection with their names or represent themselves to the public as licensed professional art therapists, professional art therapists or art therapists. It shall be unlawful for an individual to style oneself as a professional art therapist, advertise or engage in the independent practice of professional art therapy or use any words or symbols indicating or tending to indicate that the individual is a licensed professional art therapist, professional art therapist or otherwise qualified to practice professional art therapy without holding a license in good standing under this act.(b) Nonapplicability.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to the following:(1) A person employed by the Commonwealth in an art therapist position on the effective date of this subsection, 20250HB1733PN2133 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 during the time of employment by the Commonwealth in that position who has completed or is in the process of completing the education requirements to become a licensed professional art therapist or licensed associate art therapist.(2) A person who holds a valid license or is certified or regulated pursuant to another professional licensure law or State certification of the Commonwealth and who is credentialed by the Art Therapy Credentials Board as a certified art therapist.(3) A person who is practicing professional art therapy under supervision to meet the supervised clinical experience requirement to become a licensed professional art therapist pursuant to this act, if the person does not represent himself or herself as a licensed professional art therapist or professional art therapist.(4) A student enrolled in an art therapy academic program with an accredited educational institution while practicing art therapy under qualified supervision and as part of an approved course of study if the student does not represent himself or herself as a professional art therapist or art therapist. A student enrolled in an art therapy program may identify himself or herself only as an " art therapy student " or " art therapy intern. " Section 11. Section 17(b) of the act is amended to read:Section 17. Penalties.* * *(b) Civil penalty.--In addition to any other civil remedy or criminal penalty provided for in this act, the board, by a vote of the majority of the maximum number of the authorized membership of the board as provided by law, or by a vote of the 20250HB1733PN2133 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 majority of the duly qualified and confirmed membership or a minimum of three members, whichever is greater, may levy a civil penalty of up to $10,000 on any current licensee who violates any provision of this act, on any person who engages in the independent practice of clinical social work, the independent practice of marriage and family therapy [or], the independent practice of professional counseling or the independent practice of professional art therapy without being licensed pursuant to this act or on any person who holds himself or herself out as a licensed bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed professional counselor or marriage and family therapist or licensed professional art therapist or professional art therapist without being so licensed pursuant to this act. The board shall levy this penalty only after affording the accused party the opportunity for a hearing, as provided in Title 2 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes (relating to administrative law and procedure).* * *Section 12. Section 18 heading, (a) and (b) of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 18. License renewal; records and fees; reinstatement.[(a) Renewal term.--Renewal of license shall be on a biennial basis. The board may by regulation require evidence of professional activity or continuing education as a condition of license renewal. No credit shall be given for any course in office management or practice building.]* * *(b) Records.--A record of all persons licensed to practice 20250HB1733PN2133 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as bachelor social workers, social workers, clinical social workers, associate marriage and family therapists, marriage and family therapists, associate professional counselors [and], professional counselors and professional art therapists in Pennsylvania shall be kept in the office of the board and shall be open to public inspection and copying upon payment of a nominal fee for copying the record.* * *(d) Reinstatement.--(1) An individual whose license has been suspended or revoked may make written application to the board requesting reinstatement of the license upon termination of the period of suspension or revocation in a manner prescribed by the board and such application shall be accompanied by the fee provided.(2) An individual whose license has expired may make written application to the board requesting reinstatement of the license in a manner prescribed by the board and such application shall be accompanied by:(i) A renewal fee established under by the board and, for an individual whose license has been expired for one year or less, an additional fee equal to the renewal fee.(ii) Evidence satisfactory to the board that the individual has completed during the previous 24 months the continuing education requirements for one license period.(3) An individual who requests to reinstate a license that has been expired for longer than one year and who has not completed the necessary continuing education hours for 20250HB1733PN2133 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reinstatement may submit an application for a six-month reinstatement temporary license in a manner prescribed by the board. The application must be accompanied by a fee established by the board.(4) A licensee practicing under a six-month reinstatement temporary license must complete the continuing education requirements required for a permanent license prior to the expiration of the temporary license and notify the board upon completion. A six-month reinstatement temporary license may not be extended or renewed.Section 13. Section 20(a) of the act, amended March 28, 2024 (P.L.11, No.4), is amended to read:Section 20. Unlawful practice.(a) Unlawful practice prohibited.--It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the independent practice of clinical social work, the independent practice of marriage and family therapy [or], the independent practice of professional counseling or the independent practice of professional art therapy or hold oneself out as a licensed bachelor social worker, licensed social worker, licensed clinical social worker, licensed associate marriage and family therapist, marriage and family therapist, licensed associate professional counselor [and], professional counselor and licensed professional art therapist without possessing a valid, unexpired, unrevoked and unsuspended license issued under this act.* * *Section 14. Within 60 days of the effective date of this section, the Governor shall nominate two professional members to serve as the licensed professional art therapist members of the State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists, 20250HB1733PN2133 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Professional Counselors and Professional Art Therapists. The professional members initially appointed pursuant to this section need not be licensed by the licensure examination adopted by the State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists, Professional Counselors and Professional Art Therapists but, at the time of appointment, must satisfy all other requirements of this act for licensure as a professional art therapist.Section 15. The State Board of Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists, Professional Counselors and Professional Art Therapists shall promulgate final regulations to carry out the provisions of this act within 18 months of the effective date of this section.Section 16. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment or addition of sections 4, 16.5, 17(b) and 20(a) of the act shall take effect in 24 months.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1733PN2133 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718